Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8241
Department; coordination.

The department shall facilitate coordination of the State Trauma Advisory Board and the Board of Emergency Medical Services to advise the department on development of the statewide trauma system.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 41;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 111.